Ohio, session 136, HB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4507.113 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4507.113. The director of public safety shall ensure that the digest of motor vehicle laws, or any other reference document for the material covered in the written portions of the temporary instruction permit and drivers' license examinations required under section 4507.11 of the Revised Code, is written and publicly available in every language in which the bureau of motor vehicles administers the examinations.